Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1151.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 2245XC (3) 91 ss/ns S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 91C.2, subsection 3, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 3. An out-of-state The contractor shall either file a surety 3 bond, as provided in section 91C.7 , with the department in the 4 amount of twenty-five fifty thousand dollars or shall provide a 5 statement to the department that the contractor is prequalified 6 to bid on projects for the department of transportation 7 pursuant to section 314.1 . 8 Sec. 2. Section 91C.7, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 9 following new subsection: 10 NEW SUBSECTION . 7. A county, city, township, or school 11 district shall not require that a contractor file a bond other 12 than as expressly required by this Code. 13 Sec. 3. Section 91C.8, subsection 2, paragraph c, Code 2025, 14 is amended to read as follows: 15 c. The requirement that an out-of-state a contractor file a 16 bond with the department. 17 Sec. 4. Section 105.18, subsection 2, paragraph d, 18 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 19 (1) File an application and pay application fees as 20 established by the board and establish that the person meets 21 the minimum requirements adopted by the board. Through June 22 30, 2017, the application shall include the personâs state 23 contractor registration number. After July 1, 2017, the 24 The application shall include proof of workers compensation 25 insurance coverage, proof of unemployment insurance compliance, 26 and , for out-of-state contractors, a bond as described in 27 chapter 91C . 28